District of Columbia statutes.
47-351.12

Public disclosure.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, all information submitted by a financial institution to the Mayor, or the CFO pursuant to § 47-351.02(c), shall be available for public inspection and reproduction during regular business hours.

(b)

Proprietary financial and commercial information of any financial institution shall be kept confidential.

(c)

A breach of confidentiality shall be subject to the penalties set forth in § 47-351.15.

Mar. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-56, § 2(c), 44 DCR 6933
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-351.01.
1981 Ed., § 47-351.12.